Utah statutes.
17C-1-603.   Agency report.

(1) (a)  On or before November 1 of each year, each agency shall prepare and file a report with the county auditor, the State Tax Commission, the State Board of Education, and each taxing entity that levies a tax on property from which the agency collects tax increment.

(b)  The requirement of Subsection (1)(a) to file a copy of the report with the state as a taxing entity is met if the agency files a copy with the State Tax Commission and the state auditor.

(2)  Each report under Subsection (1) shall contain:

(a)  an estimate of the tax increment to be paid to the agency for the calendar year ending December 31; and

(b)  an estimate of the tax increment to be paid to the agency for the calendar year beginning the next January 1.

